District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.18

Rating organization.

A captive insurer shall not be required to join a rating organization.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 19, 52 DCR 1205
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-203, § 2(l), 61 DCR 12572
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 19 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-203 substituted “shall not be required” for “shall not required.”
This section is referenced in § 31-3932.03.